Utah statutes.
63M-7-204.   Duties of commission.

The State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice administration shall:

(1)  promote the commission's purposes as enumerated in Section 63M-7-201;

(2)  promote the communication and coordination of all criminal and juvenile justice agencies;

(3)  study, evaluate, and report on the status of crime in the state and on the effectiveness of criminal justice policies, procedures, and programs that are directed toward the reduction of crime in the state;

(4)  study, evaluate, and report on policies, procedures, and programs of other jurisdictions which have effectively reduced crime;

(5)  identify and promote the implementation of specific policies and programs the commission determines will significantly reduce crime in Utah;

(6)  provide analysis and recommendations on all criminal and juvenile justice legislation, state budget, and facility requests, including program and fiscal impact on all components of the criminal and juvenile justice system;

(7)  provide analysis, accountability, recommendations, and supervision for state and federal criminal justice grant money;

(8)  provide public information on the criminal and juvenile justice system and give technical assistance to agencies or local units of government on methods to promote public awareness;

(9)  promote research and program evaluation as an integral part of the criminal and juvenile justice system;

(10)  provide a comprehensive criminal justice plan annually;

(11)  review agency forecasts regarding future demands on the criminal and juvenile justice systems, including specific projections for secure bed space;

(12)  promote the development of criminal and juvenile justice information systems that are consistent with common standards for data storage and are capable of appropriately sharing information with other criminal justice information systems by:

(a)  developing and maintaining common data standards for use by all state criminal justice agencies;

(b)  annually performing audits of criminal history record information maintained by state criminal justice agencies to assess their accuracy, completeness, and adherence to standards;

(c)  defining and developing state and local programs and projects associated with the improvement of information management for law enforcement and the administration of justice; and

(d)  establishing general policies concerning criminal and juvenile justice information systems and making rules as necessary to carry out the duties under this Subsection (12) and Subsection (10);

(13)  allocate and administer grants, from money made available, for approved education programs to help prevent the sexual exploitation of children; and

(14)  allocate and administer grants funded from money from the Law Enforcement Operations Account created in Section 51-9-411 for law enforcement operations and programs related to reducing illegal drug activity and related criminal activity.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

